Missouri, session 2026, HB1903.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 191.765, 191.769, 191.775, 191.776, and 290.145, RSMo, are
repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 191.765,
191.769, 191.775, 191.776, and 290.145, to read as follows:
191.765. As used in sections 191.765 to [191.773] 191.777 and section 290.145, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Bar" or "tavern", any licensed establishment which serves liquor on the premises
for which not more than ten percent of the gross sales receipts of the business are supplied by
food purchases, either for consumption on the premises or elsewhere;
(2) "Marijuana", the same meaning given to the term in Article XIV, Section 2 of
the Constitution of Missouri;
(3) "Other person in charge", the agent of the proprietor authorized to give
administrative directions to and general supervision of the activities within the public place,
work place or public meeting at any given time;
[(3)] (4) "Proprietor", the party who ultimately controls, governs or directs the
activities within the public place, work place or public meeting, regardless of whether he or
she is the owner or lessor of such place or site. The term does not mean the owner of the
property unless he or she ultimately controls, governs or directs the activities within the
public place or public meeting. The term "proprietor" shall apply to a corporation as well as
an individual;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1903 2
[(4)] (5) "Public meeting", a gathering in person of members of a governmental body,
whether an open or closed session, as defined in chapter 610;
[(5)] (6) "Public place", any enclosed indoor area used by the general public or
serving as a place of work including, but not limited to:
(a) Any retail or commercial establishments;
(b) Health care facilities, health clinics or ambulatory care facilities including, but not
limited to, laboratories associated with health care treatment, hospitals, nursing homes,
physicians' offices and dentists' offices;
(c) Any vehicle used for public transportation including, but not limited to, buses,
taxicabs and limousines for hire;
(d) Rest rooms;
(e) Elevators;
(f) Libraries, educational facilities, day care facilities, museums, auditoriums and art
galleries;
(g) All public areas and waiting rooms of public transportation facilities including,
but not limited to, bus and airport facilities;
(h) Any enclosed indoor place used for entertainment or recreation including, but not
limited to, gymnasiums, theater lobbies, concert halls, arenas and swimming pools;
(i) Any other enclosed indoor areas used by the general public including, but not
limited to, corridors and shopping malls;
[(6)] (7) "Restaurant", any building, structure or area used, maintained or advertised
as or held out to the public to be an enclosure where meals for consideration of payment are
made available to be consumed on the premises;
[(7)] (8) "Smoking", possession of burning tobacco or marijuana in the form of a
cigarette, cigar, pipe or other smoking equipment.
191.769. The following areas are not considered a public place:
(1) An entire room or hall which is used for private social functions, provided that the
seating arrangements are under the control of the sponsor of the function and not of the
proprietor or other person in charge;
(2) Limousines for hire and taxicabs, where the driver and all passengers agree to
smoking in such vehicle;
(3) Performers on the stage, provided that the smoking is part of the production;
(4) A place where more than fifty percent of the volume of trade or business carried
on is that of the blending of tobaccos or marijuana or sale of tobaccos, marijuana,
cigarettes, pipes, cigars or smoking sundries;

HB 1903 3
(5) Bars, taverns, restaurants that seat less than fifty people, bowling alleys and
billiard parlors, which conspicuously post signs stating that "Nonsmoking Areas are
Unavailable";
(6) Private residences; and
(7) Any enclosed indoor arena, stadium or other facility which may be used for
sporting events and which has a seating capacity of more than fifteen thousand persons.
191.775. No person shall smoke or otherwise use tobacco[,] or tobacco products,
marijuana or marijuana products, or vapor products, as such term is defined in section
407.925, in any indoor area of a public elementary or secondary school building or
educational facility, excluding institutions of higher education, or on buses used solely to
transport students to or from school or to transport students to or from any place for
educational purposes. Any school board of any school district may set policy on the
permissible uses of tobacco or marijuana products or vapor products in any other
nonclassroom or nonstudent occupant facility, and on the school grounds or outdoor facility
areas as the school board deems proper.
191.776. No person shall smoke or otherwise use tobacco or marijuana products in
any area of a child care facility licensed by the department of health and senior services
pursuant to the provisions of sections 210.201 to 210.245 during the period of time when the
children cared for under that license are present. Any person who violates the provisions of
this section shall be guilty of an infraction.
290.145. It shall be an improper employment practice for an employer to refuse to
hire, or to discharge, any individual, or to otherwise disadvantage any individual, with respect
to compensation, terms or conditions of employment because the individual uses lawful
alcohol, marijuana, or tobacco products off the premises of the employer during hours such
individual is not working for the employer, unless such use interferes with the duties and
performance of the employee, the employee's coworkers, or the overall operation of the
employer's business; except that, nothing in this section shall prohibit an employer from
providing or contracting for health insurance benefits at a reduced premium rate or at a
reduced deductible level for employees who do not smoke or use tobacco or marijuana
products. Religious organizations and church-operated institutions, and not-for-profit
organizations whose principal business is health care promotion shall be exempt from the
provisions of this section. The provisions of this section shall not be deemed to create a cause
of action for injunctive relief, damages or other relief.
✔